Utah statutes.
13-45-401.   Enforcement.

(1)  The attorney general may enforce this chapter's provisions.

(2)  A person who violates this chapter's provisions is subject to a civil fine of:

(a)  no greater than $2,500 for a violation or series of violations concerning a specific consumer; and

(b)  no greater than $100,000 in the aggregate for related violations concerning more than one consumer.

(3)  In addition to the penalties provided in Subsection (2), the attorney general may seek injunctive relief to prevent future violations of this chapter in:

(a)  the district court located in Salt Lake City; or

(b)  the district court for the district in which resides a consumer who is the subject of a credit report on which a violation occurs.

